South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3259.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Premium rates for first responders SECTION 1.    Article 3, Chapter 77, Title 38 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 38-77-128.    (A) In determining the premium rates for a personal automobile insurance policy of a first responder, it is unlawful to consider the work-related driving record of a first responder if he is found to be noncontributing on the collision report or involved in a collision when responding to an emergency call. (B) The first responder must furnish a copy of the police incident report, investigative report, or Uniform Traffic Collision report regarding the crash in a timely manner to the insurance agent or insurer. (C) For purposes of this section, "first responder" means a law enforcement officer or firefighter employed by local, state, or federal government. An emergency medical technician, paramedic, volunteer law enforcement officer or firefighter engaged by local, state, or federal government also is considered a first responder. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 14th day of May, 2026. Approved the 15th day of May, 2026. __________